tests/cases-px.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../kum.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../kum.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "[twol] px3sp Front-vowel words":
    тарих<n><px3sp><nom> : тарихи
    тарих<n><px3sp><acc> : тарихин
    тарих<n><px3sp><gen> : тарихини
    тарих<n><px3sp><dat> : тарихине
    тарих<n><px3sp><loc> : тарихинде
    тарих<n><px3sp><abl> : тарихинден

  "[twol] px3sp Back vowel words":
    йыл<n><px3sp><nom> : йылы
    йыл<n><px3sp><acc> : йылын
    йыл<n><px3sp><gen> : йылыны
    йыл<n><px3sp><dat> : йылына
    йыл<n><px3sp><loc> : йылында
    йыл<n><px3sp><abl> : йылындан

  "[twol] px3sp Back vowel words in ё":
    ёл<n><px3sp><nom> : ёлу
    ёл<n><px3sp><acc> : ёлун
    ёл<n><px3sp><gen> : ёлуну
    ёл<n><px3sp><dat> : ёлуна
    ёл<n><px3sp><loc> : ёлунда
    ёл<n><px3sp><abl> : ёлундан

  "[twol] px3sp Back rounded vowel words in ю":
    юрт<n><px3sp><nom> : юрту
    юрт<n><px3sp><acc> : юртун
    юрт<n><px3sp><gen> : юртуну
    юрт<n><px3sp><dat> : юртуна
    юрт<n><px3sp><loc> : юртунда
    юрт<n><px3sp><abl> : юртундан

  "[twol] Front-rounded vowel words":
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><nom> : оьмюрю
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><acc> : оьмюрюн
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><gen> : оьмюрюню
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><dat> : оьмюрюне
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><loc> : оьмюрюнде
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><abl> : оьмюрюнден
    оьмюр<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : оьмюрюндеги

  "[twol] Front-rounded vowel words with ё":
    гёз<n><px3sp><nom> : гёзю
    гёз<n><px3sp><acc> : гёзюн
    гёз<n><px3sp><gen> : гёзюню
    гёз<n><px3sp><dat> : гёзюне
    гёз<n><px3sp><loc> : гёзюнде
    гёз<n><px3sp><abl> : гёзюнден
    гёз<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : гёзюндеги

  "[twol] Front-rounded vowel words with оь":
    оьр<n><px3sp><nom> : оьрю
    оьр<n><px3sp><acc> : оьрюн
    оьр<n><px3sp><gen> : оьрюню
    оьр<n><px3sp><dat> : оьрюне
    оьр<n><px3sp><loc> : оьрюнде
    оьр<n><px3sp><abl> : оьрюнден
    оьр<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : оьрюндеги

  "[lexc+twol] Dative stuff":
    иш<n><px1sg><dat> : ишиме
    иш<n><px2sg><dat> : ишинге
    иш<n><px3sp><dat> : ишине
    иш<n><px1pl><dat> : ишибизге
    иш<n><px2pl><dat> : ишигизге
